North Carolina, session 2025, HB80.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 17F of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 17F-15. Prohibit law enforcement agencies and officers from participating in
immigration enforcement on farmland and construction sites.
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no criminal justice agency, as
defined by G.S. 17C-2, or sheriff's office shall assist United States Immigration and Customs
Enforcement in the (i) apprehension or arrest of persons for alleged or suspected immigration
violations or (ii) service of warrants for removal from the United States in any of the following
locations:
(1) Real property used for any of the following:
a. Agriculture or farming, as those terms are defined by G.S. 106-581.1.
b. The slaughter, processing, or packaging of livestock.
(2) A permitted construction site, being a site where a permit, license, or other
authorization has been issued by the State or a local governmental entity for
the placement of new construction or improvements to real property.
(b) Any current or future memorandum, agreement, or contract made between a criminal
justice agency or sheriff's office and United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement shall
be void to the extent that the performance of the memorandum, agreement, or contract would
violate subsection (a) of this section.
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no criminal justice officer, as
defined by G.S. 17C-2, or justice officer, as defined by G.S. 17E-2, shall assist United States
Immigration and Customs Enforcement in the (i) apprehension or arrest of persons for alleged or
suspected immigration violations or (ii) service of warrants for removal from the United States
in any of the locations referenced in subsection (a) of this section.
(d) A willful violation of subsection (c) of this section may be used as grounds for the
suspension, revocation, or denial of the certification of a criminal justice officer under Chapter
17C of the General Statutes or a justice officer under Chapter 17E of the General Statutes.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit criminal justice agencies,
sheriffs' offices, criminal justice officers, or justice officers from enforcing the laws of this State
to the extent authorized by law."
*H80-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2. The Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission
and the Sheriffs' Education and Training Standards Commission shall promulgate rules
consistent with G.S. 17F-15, as created by Section 1 of this act.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to assistance
provided on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 80-First Edition